Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201883-381
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 83-217, 83-218, and 83-381 to 83-390, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Person with an intellectual disability means any person of significant subaverage general intellectual functioning which is associated with significant impairments in adaptive functioning manifested before the age of twenty-two years. Significant subaverage general intellectual functioning shall refer to a score of seventy or below on a properly administered and valid intelligence quotient test;

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services or such person or agency within the Department of Health and Human Services as the chief executive officer of the department may designate; and

(3) Residential facility means an institution specified under section 83-217 to provide residential care by the State of Nebraska for persons with an intellectual disability.

Laws 1969, c. 816, § 1, p. 3064;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 47;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 952;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 798;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 53;

Laws 2016, LB1039, § 2.